lib/dict/cs_CZ.aff
SFX B   out         ují        [^m]out
SFX B   out         uj         [^m]out
SFX B   out         ujme       [^m]out
SFX B   out         ujte       [^m]out
SFX B   out         ul         [^m]out
SFX B   out         ula        [^m]out
SFX B   out         ulo        [^m]out
SFX B   out         uli        [^m]out
SFX B   out         uly        [^m]out
SFX B   out         u          mout
SFX B   out         e¹         mout
SFX B   out         e          mout
SFX B   out         eme        mout
SFX B   out         ete        mout
SFX B   t           0          mout
SFX B   out         i          mout
SFX B   out         ìme        mout
SFX B   out         ìte        mout
SFX B   t           nu         tat
SFX B   t           ne¹        tat
SFX B   t           ne         tat
SFX B   t           neme       tat
SFX B   t           nete       tat
SFX B   t           nou        tat
SFX B   t           ò          tat
SFX B   t           òme        tat
SFX B   t           òte        tat
SFX B   at          ím         pat
SFX B   at          í¹         pat
SFX B   at          í          pat
SFX B   at          íme        pat
SFX B   at          íte        pat
SFX B   at          i          pat
SFX B   at          ìme        pat
SFX B   at          ìte        pat
SFX B   rat         øu         rat
SFX B   rat         øe¹        rat
SFX B   rat         øe         rat
SFX B   rat         øeme       rat
SFX B   rat         øete       rat
SFX B   rat         øou        rat
SFX B   rat         ø          rat
SFX B   rat         øme        rat
SFX B   rat         øte        rat
SFX B   0           i          [aáeì]t
SFX B   t           l          [aáeì]t
SFX B   t           la         [aáeì]t
SFX B   t           lo         [aáeì]t
SFX B   t           li         [aáeì]t
SFX B   t           ly         [aáeì]t

SFX O Y 55
SFX O   en          na         [os]ten
SFX O   en          no         [os]ten
SFX O   en          ni         [os]ten
SFX O   en          ny         [os]ten
SFX O   en          nu         [os]ten
SFX O   0           a          [^os]ten
SFX O   0           o          [^os]ten
SFX O   0           i          [^os]ten
SFX O   0           y          [^os]ten
SFX O   0           u          [^os]ten
SFX O   en          na         [bcmnpj]en
SFX O   en          no         [bcmnpj]en
SFX O   en          ni         [bcmnpj]en
SFX O   en          ny         [bcmnpj]en
SFX O   en          nu         [bcmnpj]en
SFX O   0           a          [^tbcmnpj]en
SFX O   0           o          [^tbcmnpj]en
SFX O   0           i          [^tbcmnpj]en
SFX O   0           y          [^tbcmnpj]en
SFX O   0           u          [^tbcmnpj]en
SFX O   0           a          [^e]n
SFX O   0           o          [^e]n
SFX O   0           i          [^e]n
SFX O   0           y          [^e]n
SFX O   0           u          [^e]n
SFX O   0           a          [^nlvý]
SFX O   0           o          [^nlvý]
SFX O   0           i          [^nlvýghkr]
SFX O   0           y          [^nlvý]
SFX O   0           u          [^nlvý]
SFX O   k           ci         k
SFX O   r           øi         r
SFX O   0           a          [^e]l
SFX O   0           o          [^e]l
SFX O   0           i          [^e]l
SFX O   0           y          [^e]l
SFX O   0           a          [^¹]el
SFX O   0           o          [^¹]el
SFX O   0           i          [^¹]el
SFX O   0           y          [^¹]el
SFX O   el          la         ¹el
SFX O   el          lo         ¹el
SFX O   el          li         ¹el
SFX O   el          ly         ¹el
SFX O   ev          va         ev
SFX O   ev          vo         ev
SFX O   ev          vi         ev
SFX O   ev          vy         ev
SFX O   ev          vu         ev
SFX O   0           a          [^e]v
SFX O   0           o          [^e]v
SFX O   0           i          [^e]v
SFX O   0           y          [^e]v
SFX O   0           u          [^e]v
SFX O   ý           o          ý

SFX X Y 19
SFX X   a           ouc        a
SFX X   a           ouce       a
SFX X   e           íc         e
SFX X   e           íce        e
SFX X   ì           íc         ì
SFX X   ì           íce        ì
SFX X   0           ¹i         [dv]
SFX X   0           ¹e         [dv]
SFX X   0           ¹i         et
SFX X   0           ¹e         et
SFX X   out         uv         out
SFX X   out         uv¹i       out
SFX X   out         uv¹e       out
SFX X   t           v          [ai]t
SFX X   t           v¹i        [ai]t
SFX X   t           v¹e        [ai]t
SFX X   ýt          yv         ýt
SFX X   ýt          yv¹i       ýt
SFX X   ýt          yv¹e       ýt
