lib/dict/cs_CZ.dic
bezpečný/YKRON
bezvzduąný/YKRO
blahopřát/BTN
blátivý/YKRON
blit/ON
bohat/ON
boje/XN
bouřlivý/YKRON
budu/BN
cítěn/ON
čít/BN
čit/ON
dbán/ON
děl/ON
dím/BN
dlouhý/YRON
dobit/ON
doblít/BN
dobrat/ATXN
dobyl/ON
docupu/BN
dohnal/ON
dohněten/ON
dohnít/BN
dohřát/BON
dohudl/ON
dochvět/BN
dojat/ON
dojda/XN
dojedu/BN
dojet/ION
dokapu/BN
doklovu/BN
dokontrolovat/ATXN
dokouąu/BN
dolhal/ON
dolít/BN
domelu/BN
domlel/ON
domyąlen/ON
donýt/BN
dooděju/BN
dooděn/ON
doodepíąu/BN
doodepsán/ON
dopět/B
dopíąu/BN
dopit/ON
dopleji/BN
doplet/ON
dopřát/BTN
dopředen/ON
dopsán/ON
dorazit/ACXN
dorubu/BN
dořčen/ON
dořekl/ON
dořeknu/BN
dořeknuv/XN
doříznutý/YRON
dosečen/ON
doseču/BN
dosel/ON
dosil/ON
dosmát/BN
dospět/BN
dostelu/BN
dostlal/ON
dostoupit/ATXN
dostůňu/BN
dostupen/ON
doąkubu/BN
do»al/ON
dotáľi/BN
dotnu/BN
dotra/XN
dotřásl/ON
dotýt/BN
doučil/ON
doudím/BN
dovát/BON
dovedl/ON
dovedu/BN
dovlát/BN
dovlekl/ON
dovybrat/ATXN
doznat/JTXN
dozrát/BN
doľat/ON
doľít/BTN
dra/XN
dupu/BN
duąný/YKRON
hlučný/YKRON
hořký/YKRON
hrát/BTN
hudu/BN
chmurný/YKRON
chtěje/XN
chtě/XN
chvět/BN
jal/ON
jda/XN
jedu/BN
jemný/YKRON
jsa/XN
kapu/BN
kázán/ON
káľi/BN
klovu/BN
kouąu/BN
kovu/BN
krátký/YKRON
lát/BN
lhal/ON
lha/XN
libý/YKRON
lkal/ON
lupu/BN
maje/XN
mátl/ON
matu/BN
mělký/YKRON
milostiv/ON
mlet/ON
mra/XN
mrazivý/YKRON
musil/ON
mýt/BTN
nablít/BN
nabrat/ATXN
nabyl/ON
nadát/BN
nadejda/XN
naději/BN
naděl/ON
nadepíąu/BN
nadjedu/BN
nadjel/ON
nadra/XN
nadupu/BN
nahlídnout/ATXN
nahrát/BTN
nachýlit/ATXN
najal/ON
najda/XN
najdu/BN
najmu/BN
nakázán/ON
nakáľi/BN
nalhán/ON
nalít/BN
namelu/BN
namoľen/ON
napásl/ON
napíąi/BN
napít/BN
naplel/ON
naplout/BN
napovězen/ON
narazit/ACXN
narubu/BN
nařečen/ON
nasát/BON
nasil/ON
nasmát/BN
nastat/BN
nastojím/BN
nastoupit/ATXN
nasvětlen/ON
naąít/BTN
natra/XN
natřesu/BN
naváľi/BN
naveden/ON
naznat/JTXN
nazout/BTN
naľal/ON
naľnu/BN
nerad/O
obehrát/BTN
obejda/XN
obejit/ON
obejmu/BN
obeplout/BTN
obeslal/ON
obestoupit/ATXN
obeąlu/BN
obhlédnout/ATXN
obhlídnout/ATXN
obít/BN
objal/ON
obkouąu/BN
oblačný/YKRON
oblít/BN
obměnit/ATXN
obmyąlen/ON
obout/BTN
obrýt/BTN
obstarán/ON
obstoupit/ATXN
obąít/BTN
obvít/BN
odbudu/BN
odbyl/ON
oddra/XN
odebrat/ATXN
odedra/XN
odehrát/BTN
odejda/XN
odejedu/BN
odejel/ON
odejmu/BN
odemelu/BN
odemlet/ON
odepíąu/BN
odepsal/ON
odespat/BTN
odestlal/ON
odestojím/BN
odestoupit/ATXN
odetnu/BN
odchýlit/ATXN
odjedu/BN
odkázán/ON
odkáľi/BN
odkrýt/BTN
odměnit/ATXN
odňat/ON
odpít/BN
odra/XN
odrostl/ON
odrostu/BN
odřeknuv/XN
odříznutý/YRON
odsát/BON
odstonal/ON
odstoupit/ATXN
odstůňu/BN
odtřesen/ON
odtřesu/BN
odumra/XN
odvedu/BN
odvlekl/ON
ohrát/BTN
ojet/ION
oklovu/BN
omýt/BTN
oplozen/ON
opsán/ON
orazit/ACXN
oseji/BN
osil/ON
otra/XN
otřesen/ON
otřesu/BN
ovít/BN
ozábl/ON
ozřejmit/ATXN
oľehnout/ATXN
pasu/BN
patrn/O
pít/BN
pjat/ON
pln/ON
plovaje/XN
poběľím/BN
poblit/ON
pobrat/ATXN
pobudu/BN
podebrat/ATXN
podejda/XN
podejmu/BN
poděl/ON
podeplout/BTN
podepsán/ON
podjat/ON
podlít/BN
podmíněn/ON
podstál/ON
podstojím/BN
podstoupit/ATXN
podvedl/ON
podvedu/BN
pochmurný/YKRON
pojda/XN
pojmu/BN
pokojen/ON
pokornět/AJTXN
pokovit/ATXN
pokvetu/BN
poloprázdný/YO
pomatu/BN
pomlel/ON
pomra/XN
pomýlit/ATXN
poodejdu/BN
poodjel/ON
poodstoupit/ATXN
popasu/BN
popit/ON
popluji/BN
popojda/XN
popojet/ION
popoąít/BTN
popsán/ON
porazit/ACXN
porýt/BTN
posel/ON
pospat/BN
postál/ON
postoupit/ATXN
postůňu/BN
poąel/ON
poteče/BN
potra/XN
poučil/ON
poukáľi/BN
povedl/ON
povedu/BN
povinován/ON
povyrazit/ACXN
povyrostu/BN
pozapomněl/ON
pozměnit/ATXN
poznat/JTXN
poľat/ON
poľnu/BN
problit/ON
probrat/ATXN
prodra/XN
produpu/BN
prohlédnout/ATXN
prohlídnout/ATXN
prohnán/ON
prochvět/BN
projda/XN
projmul/ON
prokapu/BN
prokouąu/BN
prolhal/ON
prolľu/BN
proměnit/ATXN
pronajal/ON
propíąi/BN
propit/ON
proplout/BTN
propsán/ON
prorazit/ACXN
prořekl/ON
prořeknuv/XN
proseji/BN
proset/ON
prospět/BN
prostonal/ON
prostoupit/ATXN
protnu/BN
protnut/ON
protra/XN
proudil/ON
provát/BON
provlékl/ON
proľenu/BN
přebrat/ATXN
předehnal/ON
předehrát/BTN
předejda/XN
předejmul/ON
předemelu/BN
předepsal/ON
předestoupit/ATXN
předeľenu/BN
předjel/ON
předrazit/ACXN
předsevzal/ON
předstoupit/ATXN
předupu/BN
předvybrat/ATXN
přehlídnout/ATXN
přehnal/ON
přehřát/BON
přechýlit/ATXN
přejat/ON
přejda/XN
překapu/BN
překontrolovat/ATXN
překrýt/BTN
přelhán/ON
přeměnit/ATXN
přemoľen/ON
přepíąi/BN
přeposlal/ON
přepoąlu/BN
přeřečen/ON
přeřeknuv/XN
přeseču/BN
přesekl/ON
přestál/ON
přestelu/BN
přestoupit/ATXN
pře»al/ON
přetra/XN
přetřesen/ON
přetřesu/BN
převezmu/BN
převlékl/ON
přeľít/BTN
přibrat/ATXN
přibyl/ON
přihrát/BTN
přijat/ON
přijda/XN
přikapu/BN
přilít/BN
přilit/ON
přioděn/ON
připíąi/BN
připomněl/ON
přirazit/ACXN
přirostl/ON
přirostu/BN
přisát/BON
přispat/BN
přistál/ON
přistoupit/ATXN
přiąít/BTN
přítomen/ON
přitra/XN
přivstat/BN
přizabit/ON
přiznat/JTXN
půjčil/ON
razit/ACXN
rozbít/BN
rozbit/ON
rozedra/XN
rozehřát/BON
rozejda/XN
rozemlel/ON
rozepíąi/BN
rozepsán/ON
rozespat/BTN
rozestlal/ON
rozestoupit/ATXN
rozetnu/BN
rozetra/XN
rozeznat/JTXN
rozhlédnout/ATXN
rozhlídnout/ATXN
rozjedu/BN
rozkázán/ON
rozkouąu/BN
rozlít/BN
rozměnit/ATXN
rozpomněl/ON
rozpoznat/JTXN
rozptýlit/ATXN
rozrýt/BTN
rozsečen/ON
rozsil/ON
rozstoupit/ATXN
roząít/BTN
roztřásl/ON
roztřesu/BN
rozvit/ON
rozľav/XN
rozľehnout/ATXN
rozľnu/BN
ruąný/YKRON
řeknuv/XN
říznutý/YRON
řka/XN
sát/BON
sbit/ON
sebrat/ATXN
sedra/XN
sejda/XN
sejdu/BN
sejmut/ON
semelu/BN
semlel/ON
seříznutý/YRON
seseču/BN
sestoupit/ATXN
seąel/ON
setnu/BN
setra/XN
seznat/JTXN
seľal/ON
seľehnout/ATXN
shnít/BN
schýlit/ATXN
sjel/ON
skrýt/BTN
slabý/YKRO
slizký/YKRO
smát/BN
směnit/ATXN
snadný/YKRON
spasen/ON
spat/BN
spoluproľít/BTN
spředen/ON
srazit/ACXN
stal/ON
s»at/ON
stelu/BN
střásl/ON
superdlouhý/YRO
svát/BON
svlékl/ON
ąikmý/YKRON
ąít/BTN
»at/ON
teka/XN
tepu/BN
těľký/YKRO
tra/XN
tvrdý/YKRON
ubít/BN
ubrat/ATXN
učil/ON
udím/BN
udra/XN
uhněten/ON
uhřát/BON
ujda/XN
ujel/ON
ukapu/BN
ukázán/ON
ukout/BTN
umelu/BN
umra/XN
upít/BN
upit/ON
urazit/ACXN
uřečen/ON
uřeknuv/XN
usebrat/ATXN
uspat/BTN
ustál/ON
ustojím/BN
ustoupit/ATXN
u»al/ON
utra/XN
uváľi/BN
uveden/ON
uvit/ON
uznat/JTXN
uzrát/BN
valuta/ZXQ
vazký/YKRO
váľi/BN
věda/XN
vědom/ON
vejda/XN
vejdu/BN
vepsán/ON
vetnu/BN
vetra/XN
větrný/YKRON
vida/XN
vidovat/ATXN
vít/BN
vjel/ON
vlít/BN
vlit/ON
vrazit/ACXN
vrostl/ON
vrýt/BTN
vsát/ON
vstoupit/ATXN
vąít/BTN
v»at/ON
vybrat/ATXN
vydobudu/BN
vydobyl/ON
vydra/XN
vyhlédnout/ATXN
vyhlídnout/ATXN
vyhrát/BTN
vychýlit/ATXN
vyjda/XN
vyjel/ON
vyjmu/BN
vykázán/ON
vykouąu/BN
vylít/BN
vyměnit/ATXN
vymlel/ON
vymra/XN
vynajdu/BN
vyňal/ON
vypásl/ON
vypíąi/BN
vyplel/ON
vyplout/BN
vypsán/ON
vyrazit/ACXN
vyřeknu/BN
vysát/ON
vyset/ON
vysmát/BN
vysoký/YKRON
vystojím/BN
vystonal/ON
vystoupit/ATXN
vyąlu/BN
vy»at/ON
vytnu/BN
vytra/XN
vyváľi/BN
vyvedl/ON
vyznat/JTXN
vyzrát/BN
vyľat/ON
vzdout/BTN
vzejda/XN
vzepjal/ON
vzpomněl/ON
vzrostu/BN
zabrat/ATXN
začastý/YON
zadout/BTN
zadra/XN
zahlídnout/ATXN
zahřát/BON
zahudl/ON
zajda/XN
zajdu/BN
zajel/ON
zakáľi/BN
zaklet/ON
zalľu/BN
zaměnit/ATXN
zamlel/ON
zapíąi/BN
zapit/ON
zapoąít/BTN
zapovězen/ON
zapůjčil/ON
zarazit/ACXN
zařeknu/BN
zasel/ON
zasout/BTN
zastlal/ON
zastoupit/ATXN
zastůňu/BN
za»at/ON
zatnu/BN
zatra/XN
zaujal/ON
zaváľi/BN
zavit/ON
zavrľu/BN
zaľal/ON
zaľehnout/ATXN
zaľít/BTN
zblít/BN
zbyl/ON
zdupu/BN
zebu/BN
zemra/XN
zesiláľovat/ATXN
zhlídnout/ATXN
zkontrolovat/ATXN
zkovu/BN
zlit/ON
změnit/ATXN
zmýlit/ATXN
zmyąlen/ON
zneuľít/BTN
zout/BTN
zpokornět/AJTXN
zrubu/BN
zřečen/ON
zřeknuv/XN
zůstat/BN
zván/ON
ľat/ON
ľenu/BN
